Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202059-1405
Discrimination in price; price changes; exceptions.

All music licensing agencies who sell, license the use of, or in any manner whatsoever dispose of, in this state, the performing rights in or to any copyrighted musical composition shall refrain from discriminating in price or terms between licensees similarly situated, except that differentials based upon applicable business factors which justify different prices or terms shall not be considered discriminations within the meaning of this section. Nothing contained in this section shall prevent price changes from time to time by reason of changing conditions affecting the market for or marketability of performing rights.

Laws 1945, c. 139, § 5, p. 440;

Laws 2018, LB1120, § 39.